Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2659.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 5819HV (2) 91 lh/jh H.F. 2659 Section 1. AFFORDABLE HOUSING TASK FORCE. 1 1. An affordable housing task force is created to identify 2 state and local regulatory barriers that contribute to the cost 3 of affordable housing and to examine the corresponding public 4 benefit of such regulations relative to their impact on housing 5 costs. 6 2. The task force shall study and make recommendations 7 concerning state and local regulations and practices affecting 8 the development and availability of affordable housing, 9 including but not limited to the following areas: 10 a. Zoning and land use regulations. 11 b. State and local building codes. 12 c. Permitting and approval processes. 13 d. State and local funding mechanisms. 14 3. The task force members shall be chosen to reflect 15 geographic diversity and shall consist of the following: 16 a. The state building code commissioner or the 17 commissionerâs designee. 18 b. The state fire marshal or the fire marshalâs designee. 19 c. The director of the Iowa economic development authority 20 or the directorâs designee. 21 d. Three members representing housing developers, appointed 22 by the governor. 23 e. One elected official of a city with a population of fifty 24 thousand or more, appointed by the governor. 25 f. One elected official of a city with a population of fewer 26 than fifty thousand, appointed by the governor. 27 g. One county supervisor from a county with a population of 28 fifty thousand or more, appointed by the governor. 29 h. One county supervisor from a county with a population of 30 fewer than fifty thousand, appointed by the governor. 31 i. Two members of the house of representatives, one 32 appointed by the speaker of the house and one appointed by the 33 minority leader of the house. 34 j. Two members of the senate, one appointed by the majority 35 -1- LSB 5819HV (2) 91 lh/jh 1/ 3 H.F. 2659 leader of the senate and one appointed by the minority leader 1 of the senate. 2 k. A director of a cityâs or countyâs planning and zoning 3 department, division, or authority, or similar entity even 4 if a different nomenclature is used to describe the entity, 5 appointed by the governor. 6 l. One member of a housing nonprofit organization, 7 appointed by the governor. 8 m. One member of the housing lending organization, 9 appointed by the governor. 10 n. One member of an economic development group, appointed by 11 the governor. 12 4. Members of the task force shall serve without 13 compensation but shall be reimbursed for actual expenses 14 incurred in the performance of their official duties. Task 15 force members who are members of the general assembly shall 16 be paid in accordance with section 2.32A. The remaining task 17 force members shall be reimbursed from moneys appropriated for 18 such a purpose. 19 5. On or before December 1, 2026, the task force shall 20 submit a written report to the general assembly detailing 21 the task forceâs findings and recommendations, including 22 any proposed statutory or administrative changes to reduce 23 regulatory barriers to affordable housing while preserving 24 public health and safety. 25